Missouri, session 2026, SB1797.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
two new sections, to be known as sections 1.141 and 1.4500, to
read as follows:
1.141. If any provision of a legislative act is found
unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction for
any reason, whether procedural or substantive, the provision
shall be severed, the remaining provisions shall be valid,
and the court shall presume that the general assembly would
have enacted the valid provisions without the void one;
provided that if the court finds by clear and convincing
evidence that the general assembly would not have enacted
the valid provisions absent the void provision, then the
valid provisions shall also be declared invalid. Clear and
convincing evidence shall include, but not be limited to, a
finding that the valid provisions, standing alone, are
incomplete and are incapable of being executed in accordance
with the legislative intent.
1.4500. In the event that any section, provision,
clause, phrase, or word of a legislative act or the
application thereof is declared invalid under the

SB 1797 2
Constitution of the United States or the Constitution of the
State of Missouri, it is the intent of the general assembly
that the remaining sections of the act remain in force and
effect as far as they are capable of being carried into
execution as intended by the general assembly. The general
assembly hereby declares that it would have passed each
section, provision, clause, phrase, or word thereof,
irrespective of the fact that any one or more sections,
provisions, clauses, phrases, or words of a legislative act
or the application of the legislative act would be declared
unenforceable, unconstitutional, or invalid.
✓